Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.340

Time and place of meeting.

The electors of the president and vice president shall convene at the seat of government on the day fixed by federal statute, at the hour of twelve o'clock noon of that day.

[ 2019 c 143 s 11; 2003 c 111 s 1427; 1977 ex.s. c 238 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.71.040. Prior: 1909 c 22 s 1; 1891 c 148 s 3; RRS s 5140. Formerly RCW 29.71.040.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.